Hawaii statutes.
[§414-18] Evidentiary effect of copy of
filed document. A certificate attached to a copy of a document filed by
the department director, bearing the department director's signature (which may
be in facsimile) and the seal of the department of commerce and consumer
affairs, is conclusive evidence that the original document is on file with the
department director. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next